California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(3) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the recording by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(4) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The relinquished former portion of Route 25 shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The relinquished former portion of Route 25 may not
 be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(5) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission shall, upon terms and conditions approved by it, adopt into the state highway system the proposed easterly bypass alignment for Route 25 that is located between Sunnyslope Road and San Felipe Road in the City of Hollister. The adoption may occur at any time after the effective date of the relinquishment pursuant to paragraph (3).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 6.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

Route 26 is from:

(a) Route 99 in Stockton to Route 12 at Valley Springs.

(b) Route 12 to Route 88 near Pioneer Station via Mokelumne Hill and West Point.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 35.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

Route 27 is from Route 1 near Topanga Beach to Route 118.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

Route 28 is from Route 89 at Tahoe City along the northern boundary of Lake Tahoe to the Nevada state line at Crystal Bay.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

329.

Route 29 is from Route 80 near Vallejo to Route 20 near Upper Lake via the vicinity of Napa, via Calistoga, via Lower Lake, passing south of Kelseyville and via Lakeport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1371.)
-------------------------------------------

332.

Route 32 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Orland to Route 99 near Chico.

(b) Route 99 near Chico to Route 36.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

333.

Route 33 is from:

(a) Route 101 near Ventura to Route 150.

(b) Route 150 to Route 5 near Oilfields via the vicinity of Cuyama Valley and Maricopa and via Coalinga.

(c) Route 5 to Route 152 via the vicinity of Mendota.

(d) Route 152 west of Los Banos to Route 5 near Santa Nella.

(e) Route 5 near Santa Nella to Route 140.

(f) Route 140 to Route 5 near Vernalis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

333.1.

Notwithstanding Section 253.3, no portion of the adopted Route 33 freeway between Foster Park and Cozy Dell Canyon Road shall be constructed as a freeway or expressway until a transportation corridor study, on a transportation corridor approximating such portion of the adopted Route 33 freeway, is undertaken and carried to a conclusion by the department in cooperation with the affected local governing agencies, including the County of Ventura and the City of Ojai, and a plan of action for fulfilling the corridor transportation needs has been mutually agreed upon by the parties conducting the study.

The transportation corridor study shall, when undertaken, follow a process which includes community involvement and participation in reaching a finding on the transportation needs, and in selection of the optimum means of fulfilling those needs, for the corridor and its related service area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

334.

(a) Route 34 is from Rice Avenue in the City of Oxnard to Route 118 near Somis.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 34 within the City of Oxnard are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For those relinquished former portions of Route 34, the City of Oxnard shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 34.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

335.

Route 35 is from:

(a) Route 17 at Summit Road to Route 92 via Skyline Boulevard.

(b) Route 92 to Route 280 at Bunker Hill Drive.

(c) Route 280 via Skyline Boulevard to Route 1 in San Francisco.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

336.

Route 36 is from Route 101 near Alton to Route 395 near Johnsonville passing near Forest Glen via Red Bluff and Mineral, via the vicinity of Morgan Summit, and via Susanville.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

337.

Route 37 is from:

(a) Route 251 near Nicasio to Route 101 near Novato.

(b) Route 101 near Novato to Route 80 near Lake Chabot via the vicinity of Sears Point and via the former Sears Point Toll Road.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

338.

Route 38 is from:

(a) Route 10 near Redlands to Route 18 near Baldwin Lake via Barton Flats.

(b) Route 18 near Baldwin Lake along the north side of Big Bear Lake to Route 18 near the west end of Big Bear Lake.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

339.

Route 39 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Huntington Beach to the southern city limit of Buena Park.

(b) Route 5 in Buena Park to Route 72 in La Habra via Beach Boulevard.

(c) Beach Boulevard to Harbor Boulevard in La Habra via Whittier Boulevard.

(d) Whittier Boulevard in La Habra to Route 2 via Harbor Boulevard to the vicinity of Fullerton Road, then to Azusa Avenue, Azusa Avenue to San Gabriel Canyon Road, San Gabriel Avenue southbound between Azusa Avenue and San Gabriel Canyon Road, and San Gabriel Canyon Road, other than the portion of the segment described by this subdivision that is within the
 city limits of Azusa, Covina, and West Covina.

(e) The relinquished former portions of Route 39 within the city limits of Azusa, Buena Park, Covina, and West Covina are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 39, the Cities of Azusa, Buena Park, Covina, and West Covina shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 39.

(f) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best
 interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Anaheim the portion of Route 39 that is located within the city limits of Anaheim from the Anaheim/Stanton city limit north of Starr Street to the Anaheim/Buena Park city limit at North Stanton Avenue, if the city and the department enter into an agreement providing for the relinquishment. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 39 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 39 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the relinquished former portion of Route 39, the City of Anaheim shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 39.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   (SB 52)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

340.

Route 40 is from Route 15 at Barstow to the Arizona state line near Topock, Arizona via Needles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

341.

Route 41 is from:

(a) Route 1 in Morro Bay to Route 46.

(b) Route 46 to Route 99 in Fresno.

(c) Route 99 in Fresno to Yosemite National Park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 31.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

343.

Route 43 is from:

(a) Route 119 to Route 46 in Wasco.

(b) Route 46 in Wasco to Route 99 near Selma.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

344.

Route 44 is from Route 299 at Redding to Route 36 west of Susanville, via the vicinity of Lassen Volcanic National Park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

345.

Route 45 is from:

(a) Route 113 near Knights Landing to Route 20 near Sycamore.

(b) Route 20 near Colusa to Route 32 near Hamilton City.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

346.

Route 46 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Cambria to Route 101 near Paso Robles.

(b) Route 101 in Paso Robles to Route 99 near Famoso via Cholame Pass.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 32.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

347.

Route 47 is from Route 110 in San Pedro to Route 10 via the Vincent Thomas Bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

347.1.

Route 47 shall also include that portion of Henry Ford Avenue from Route 47 to Alameda Street and that portion of Alameda Street from Henry Ford Avenue to Route 91.

Route 47 shall not include that portion of the adopted route from Route 1 to Willow Street and that portion of the adopted alignment from Willow Street to Route 405.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 18.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

348.

Route 48 is from Route 14 near Lancaster to Route 122 near the San Bernardino county line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 10, Sec. 7.   Effective February 9, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

349.

(a) Route 49 is from:

(1) Route 41 near Oakhurst to Route 140 at Mariposa.

(2) Route 140 at Mariposa to Route 120 near Moccasin.

(3) Route 120 near Chinese Camp to Route 80 near Auburn via the vicinity of Sonora; via Angels Camp, San Andreas, and Jackson; and via the vicinity of El Dorado, Diamond Springs, and Placerville.

(4) Route 80 near Auburn to Route 20 in Grass Valley.

(5) Route 20 at Nevada City to Route 89 near Sattley via Downieville.

(6) Route 89 near Sierraville to Route 70 near Vinton via Loyalton.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 49 within the City of Auburn is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 49, the City of Auburn shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 49. The city may apply to the department for approval of a business route designation in accordance with Chapter 20, Topic 21, of the Highway Design Manual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 8.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

350.

Route 50 is from Route 80 west of Sacramento to the Nevada state line near Lake Tahoe via Placerville.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

351.

Route 51 is from Route 50 in Sacramento to Route 80 east of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

351.1.

Notwithstanding Section 640, Route 51 shall be signed Interstate Business Loop 80.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

352.

Route 52 is from Route 5 east of La Jolla to Route 67 near Santee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

353.

Route 53 is from Route 29 to Route 20 via Clearlake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 36.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

354.

(a) Route 54 is from Route 5 near the Sweetwater River to the southern city limits of El Cajon.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 54 within the City of El Cajon is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81.

(c) The City of El Cajon may not impose any special restriction on the operation of buses or commercial motor vehicles, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 34601 of the Vehicle Code, on the relinquished former portion of Route 54 if that restriction is in addition to restrictions authorized under other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

(a) Route 55 is from the south end of Newport Beach Channel Bridge to Route 91 in Santa Ana Canyon.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 55 within the City of Newport Beach are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 55, the City of Newport Beach shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 55. The City of Newport Beach shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished former portions of Route 1 within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 8.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

Route 56 is from Route 5 north of La Jolla to Route 67.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

357.

Route 57 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Huntington Beach to Route 22 near Santa Ana.

(b) Route 5 near Santa Ana to Route 210 near San Dimas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 221, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

358.

(a) Route 58 is from:

(1) Route 101 near Santa Margarita to Route 33.

(2) Route 33 to Route 43.

(3) Route 43 to just west of Van Buren Place near Bakersfield.

(4) Mohawk Street near Bakersfield to Route 99.

(5) Route 99 to Route 15 near Barstow via Bakersfield and Mojave.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do
 so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Bakersfield or the County of Kern the portion of Route 58 that is located within the jurisdiction of that city or county if the city or county agrees to accept it. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 58 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 58
 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the portion of Route 58 that is relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Bakersfield or the County of Kern shall install and maintain within the jurisdiction of the city or county signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 58.

(c) The relinquished former portions of Route 58 within the unincorporated area of the County of Kern and within the City of Bakersfield are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 58, the County of Kern and the City of Bakersfield shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 58.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 9.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

359.

Route 59 is from:

(a) Route 152 northerly to Route 99 near Merced.

(b) Route 99 near Merced to Snelling.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

360.

Route 60 is from:

(a) Route 10 near the Los Angeles River in Los Angeles to Route 215 in Riverside via Pomona.

(b) Route 215 near Moreno Valley to Route 10 near Beaumont.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 37.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

361.

Route 61 is from Route 84 near Newark to Route 580 near Albany via the vicinity of San Leandro and Oakland International Airport and via Alameda.

No portion of Route 61 shall be constructed as a freeway north of Hegenberger Road.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

362.

Route 62 is from Route 10 near Whitewater to the Arizona state line near Earp via Morongo Valley, the vicinity of Yucca Valley, Twentynine Palms, Rice, and Vidal Junction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

363.

Route 63 is from:

(a) Route 137 near Tulare to Route 198.

(b) Route 198 to Route 180 via the vicinity of Orosi and Orange Cove.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

364.

Route 64 is from Route 1 near Malibu Beach to Route 5 south of San Fernando.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

365.

Route 65 is from:

(a) Route 99 near Bakersfield to Route 198 near Exeter.

(b) Route 198 near Exeter to Route 80 near Roseville on a route along the easterly side of the San Joaquin Valley, which route may include all or portions of any existing state highway route.

(c) Route 80 near Roseville to Route 70 near Marysville.

(d) Route 70 near Marysville to Route 99 in or near Yuba City.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

366.

(a) Route 66 is from:

(1) Route 210 near San Dimas to the eastern city limit of the City of Pomona.

(2) The eastern city limit of the City of Rialto to Route 215 in San Bernardino.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 66 within the city limits of the Cities of Claremont, Fontana, Rancho Cucamonga, Rialto, and Upland are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the portions of Route 66 relinquished under this section, the Cities of Claremont, Fontana, Rancho Cucamonga, Rialto, and Upland shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing
 motorists to the continuation of Route 66 and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 66, including any traffic signal progression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 10.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

367.

Route 67 is from Route 8 near El Cajon to Route 78 near Ramona.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

368.

(a) Route 68 is from:

(1) Asilomar State Beach to Route 1.

(2) Monterey to Route 101 in Salinas.

(b) (1) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Pacific Grove or the County of Monterey the portion of Route 68 described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) located within the jurisdiction of the city or the unincorporated area of the county, respectively, if the department and the city or county
 enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution concerning the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 68 relinquished under this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 68 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) The city or county shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the
 relinquished former portion of Route 68 within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(5) The city or county shall maintain signs on the relinquished former portion of Route 68 within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 68.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 11.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

370.

Route 70 is from:

(a) Route 99 near Catlett Road to Route 20 in Marysville.

(b) Route 20 in Marysville to Route 395 near Hallelujah Junction via Quincy and Beckwourth Pass.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

Route 71 is from Route 57 to Route 91 via Pomona and Chino Hills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 19.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

372.

Route 72 is from Route 39 to Route 605 in Whittier, except as follows:

(a) Route 72 shall cease to be a state highway when Route 90 freeway is completed from Route 5 to Route 39.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 72 within the City of Montebello, the City of Pico Rivera, and the County of Los Angeles are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 72, the Cities of Montebello and Pico Rivera and the County of Los Angeles shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 72.

(c) The commission may relinquish to the City of Whittier and the County of Los Angeles the portion of Route 72 within their respective jurisdictional limits, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the city and the county enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(1) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall occur:

(A) Any portion of Route 72 relinquished pursuant to this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) Any portion of Route 72 relinquished pursuant to this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(C) For any portion of Route 72 relinquished pursuant to this subdivision, the City of Whittier and the County of Los Angeles shall maintain signs within their respective jurisdictional limits directing motorists to the continuation of Route 72.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 636, Sec. 4.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

373.

Route 73 is from Route 5 near San Juan Capistrano to Route 405 via the San Joaquin Hills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

374.

(a) Route 74 is from:

(1) Route 5 near San Juan Capistrano to Route 15 near Lake Elsinore.

(2) Route 215 near Perris to the southern city limit of Palm Desert.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 74 within the Cities of Lake Elsinore, Palm Desert, and Perris, and the County of Riverside, are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the former portions of Route 74, the Cities of Lake Elsinore, Palm Desert, and Perris, and the County of Riverside, shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing
 motorists to the continuation of Route 74. The Cities of Lake Elsinore, Palm Desert, and Perris shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 74, including any traffic signal progression.

(c) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Lake Elsinore the portion of Route 74 located within the city limits of that city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(2) Any relinquishment agreement shall require that the City of Lake Elsinore administer the operation and maintenance of the highway in a manner consistent with professional traffic engineering standards.

(3) Any relinquishment agreement shall require the City
 of Lake Elsinore to ensure that appropriate traffic studies or analyses will be performed to substantiate any decisions affecting the highway.

(4) Any relinquishment agreement shall also require the City of Lake Elsinore to provide for public notice and the consideration of public input on the proximate effects of any proposed decision on traffic flow, residences, or businesses, other than a decision on routine maintenance.

(5) Notwithstanding any of its other terms, any relinquishment agreement shall require the City of Lake Elsinore to indemnify and hold the department harmless from any liability for any claims made or damages suffered by any person, including a public entity, as a result of any decision made or action taken by the City of Lake Elsinore, its officers,
 employees, contractors, or agents, with respect to the design, maintenance, construction, or operation of that portion of Route 74 that is to be relinquished to the city.

(6) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately after the county recorder records the relinquishment resolution that contains the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(7) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision may
 not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(8) The City of Lake Elsinore shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the portion of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision, including any traffic signal progression.

(9) For portions of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Lake Elsinore shall maintain signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 74.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the City of Hemet the portion of Route 74 that is located within the city limits of the City of Hemet, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the City of Hemet enter
 into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the recordation by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the
 relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) The City of Hemet shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the portion of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision, including any traffic signal progression.

(5) For portions of Route 74 relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Hemet
 shall maintain signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 74.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 6.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

375.

(a) Route 75 is from Route 5 to Route 5 via the Silver Strand and the San Diego-Coronado Toll Bridge.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish portions of Route 75, if the department and the applicable local agency enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment, as follows:

(1) To the City of Imperial Beach, the portions of Route 75 within its city limits.

(2) To the City of San Diego, the
 portions of Route 75 within its city limits.

(c) The following conditions apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portions of Route 75 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portions of Route 75 relinquished under subdivision (b) and this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) The
 Cities of Imperial Beach and San Diego shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 75, including any traffic signal progression.

(5) For the portions of Route 75 relinquished under subdivision (b) and this subdivision, the Cities of Imperial Beach and San Diego shall install and maintain, within their respective jurisdictions, signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 75, to the extent deemed necessary by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.   (AB 1500)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

376.

(a) Route 76 is from Route 5 near Oceanside to Route 79 near Lake Henshaw.

(b) (1) The following portions of Route 76 in the County of San Diego shall be known and designated as the “Payómkawish Highway”:

(A) From Sengme Oaks Road, at postmile 41.572,
 to Rincon Rancho Road, at postmile R34.223.

(B) From Pauma Reservation Road, at postmile 28.990, to Pankey Road, at postmile R17.87.

(2) The department shall determine the cost of appropriate signs, consistent with the signing requirements for the state highway system, showing the special designation described in paragraph (1) and, upon receiving donations from nonstate sources sufficient to cover the cost, shall erect those signs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 86, Sec. 2.   (AB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

377.

Route 77 is from:

(a) Route 880 near 42nd Avenue to a connection with Route 580 near High Street in Oakland.

(b) Route 580 in Oakland to Route 24 near Lafayette.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

378.

Route 78 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Oceanside to Route 15 near Escondido.

(b) Route 15 near Escondido to Route 86 passing near Ramona, Santa Ysabel, and Julian.

(c) Route 86 near Brawley to Route 10 near Blythe.

The portion of the route described in subdivision (c) between the easterly junction of Route 115 and the Imperial-Riverside county line shall be known and designated as the “Ben Hulse Highway.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

379.

(a) Route 79 is from:

(1) Route 8 near Descanso to Route 78 near Julian.

(2) Route 78 near Santa Ysabel to the Temecula city limits east of Butterfield Stage Road.

(3) Temecula city limits south of Murrieta Hot Springs Road to Route 74 near Hemet.

(4) Route 74 near Hemet to the San Jacinto city limit near Menlo Avenue.

(5) The San Jacinto city limit near Sanderson Avenue to Route 10 near Beaumont.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 79 within the City of Temecula and the City of San Jacinto are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 79, the City of Temecula and the City of San Jacinto shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 79. The City of Temecula shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished former portions of Route 79 within its jurisdiction, including any traffic signal progression.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the City of Hemet the portion of Route 79 that is located within the city limits of that city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and
 the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 79 shall cease to be a state highway.

(4) The portion of Route 79 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(5) For the portion of Route 79 that is relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Hemet shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route
 79.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 22.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

380.

Route 80 is from:

(a) Route 101 near Division Street in San Francisco to Route 280 near First Street in San Francisco.

(b) Route 280 near First Street in San Francisco to the Nevada state line near Verdi, Nevada, passing near Oakland, via Albany, via Sacramento, passing near Roseville, via Auburn, via Emigrant Gap, via Truckee and via the Truckee River Canyon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

380.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) It is in the interest of the well-being of the traveling public in the state to bring the ramps connecting Yerba Buena Island to the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge under the ownership and control of the State of California, and to ensure the reconstruction of those ramps according to contemporary design standards.

(2) It is in the best interest of the traveling public to begin work on the ramps as soon as possible in order to coordinate this work with the design and construction of the new east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge.

(b) (1) The department shall work in cooperation with the authority on the design and engineering of replacement ramps connecting Yerba Buena Island to the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge.

(2) The department shall work in cooperation with the authority and the San Francisco County Transportation Authority to ensure that the design of the new ramps and the new eastern span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge are compatible.

(c) Upon the transfer of any portion of former Naval Station Treasure Island to the authority that includes the ramp connections on the eastern side of Yerba Buena Island connecting the island to the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, the department is authorized to accept from the authority title, easements, and other interests in land that may be necessary for the state to own and operate one or more of the ramps.

(d) The transfer of a ramp from the authority to the state is contingent on all of the following:

(1) A finding by the California Transportation Commission that the transfer is in the best interests of the state.

(2) Approval by the California Transportation Commission of the terms and conditions of the transfer agreement entered into between the authority and the department.

(3) Completion of work on the ramp, in accordance with current seismic, engineering, and safety design standards as approved by the department, prior to the transfer.

(e) In accordance with state requirements, a project study report on the reconstruction of the ramps shall be finalized on or before December 31, 2008. The San Francisco County Transportation Authority shall be the lead agency for the development of the project study report and it shall work in coordination with the authority, the Mayor of the City of San Francisco, and the Bay Area Toll Authority.

(f) Nothing in this section shall require a commitment of state funding from (1) the State Highway Account or (2) toll revenues or other sources of funding under the jurisdiction of the Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee established pursuant to Section 30952.1. This does not preclude a local entity from seeking any available funds for the reconstruction of the ramps, including state funds available to the local entity.

(g) For purposes of this section, “authority” means the Treasure Island Development Authority, a nonprofit public benefit corporation established by the legislative body of the City and County of San Francisco and the Treasure Island Conversion Act of 1997 (Chapter 898 of the Statutes of 1997).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

380.3.

There will be increased motor vehicle traffic on San Pablo Avenue in the County of Contra Costa and the Cities of El Cerrito, Richmond, San Pablo, Pinole, and Hercules because traffic will be detoured onto San Pablo Avenue during construction work on State Route 80 to convert the existing shoulder to additional traffic lanes. Because of the increased traffic caused by the detour, the department may pay annually to that county and each of those cities the added costs of maintenance and operation of San Pablo Avenue.

This section shall remain in effect only until the department certifies to the Secretary of State that construction is complete on the project on State Route 80 in Contra Costa County to convert the existing shoulder to additional traffic lanes, and as of the date of that certification is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1164, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.   Repealed as of date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

380.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there will be increased traffic on San Pablo Avenue in the Cities of Richmond, San Pablo, Pinole, Hercules, and El Cerrito, and other portions of San Pablo Avenue in the County of Contra Costa by motor vehicles detoured because of construction work on Route 80 in Contra Costa County.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that the state share in the cost of maintaining and operating San Pablo Avenue to the extent that it is used as an alternative to Route 80 during construction. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the department pay up to the amount authorized in this section to the County of Contra Costa and to each city specified in subdivision (a).

(c) During the period of construction, the department may pay annually to the County of Contra Costa and to each of the cities specified in subdivision (a) for the added costs of maintenance and operation of San Pablo Avenue. The total obligation of the department for this purpose shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per year, adjusted for inflation, as reflected by a change in a national or regional index that measures the rate of inflation, as determined by the department.
